Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-518
Bonds; signatures; negotiability.

In case any of the members or officers of the contracting public body whose signatures appear on any bonds shall cease to be such members or officers before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, as if such members or officers had remained in office until the delivery. Any bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of the Nebraska Redevelopment Act are fully negotiable.

Laws 1995, LB 830, § 18.